Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1690.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that the lack of comprehensive statewide information on the status of water and sewer systems and the upgrades that are needed for these systems is of critical environmental, public health, and economic consequence to the state.(2) The legislature notes the following conditions:(a) Public works grants continue to be unable to accommodate local governments' abilities to maintain, repair, and expand water and sewer systems within the urban growth areas and densely populated areas adjacent to the urban growth area.(b) Reports by county health officials indicate an increasing presence of human coliform in residential wells throughout the state.(c) County governments face structural financial limits of capacity and staffing to inspect and require maintenance of septic systems and connect septic systems to new or existing sewer lines. Some counties may not have current information on the number and condition of septic systems and well water quality.(d) Municipal governments have limited financial capacity to accommodate existing and new businesses because of the lack of sewer access and disposal in smaller communities, resulting in a lack of economic development and employment opportunities.(e) Programs within the capital budget are inadequate to meet current and increasing needs.(f) Housing development demand and, specifically, the need for low-income housing are increasing, resulting in tiny house villages and multifamily housing being built in mature neighborhoods with aging water and sewer infrastructure, adding to the cost of such housing.(g) The addition of human waste to water flowing into lowland lakes is adding to the problems of blue-green algae blooms, noxious weed growth, and poor salmon habitat and potential habitat.(h) Urban lake degradation has a detrimental impact on the quality of life and economy of nearby communities. One example is when world-class rowing competitions in Vancouver Lake need to be canceled because of algae blooms.(3) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to identify gaps in current information, costs needed to fix existing systems, and recommendations for how to ensure water and sewer infrastructure needs are met to protect environmental resources, public health, and communities across the state.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.21A RCW to read as follows:(1) The department and the department of health must jointly conduct and produce a comprehensive assessment of the current maintenance and upgrade needs for water and sewer systems throughout the state to prevent pollution, protect public health, and support communities and the economy. The department and the department of health may:(a) Consult with and solicit data as necessary to obtain detailed information on water and sewer facilities in the state from entities including, but not limited to: Relevant state agencies, boards, and commissions; cities; counties; local boards of health; public and private water and sewer utilities; and conservation districts; and(b) Review relevant projects to inform the development of a successful needs assessment from other states such as the mid-county sewer project conducted in Multnomah county.(2) The needs assessment may include, but is not limited to:(a) A list of water and sewer systems in the state that need critical upgrades or maintenance;(b) An analysis of the costs required to upgrade and maintain such systems; and(c) Options for program design and potential funding strategies.(3) The department and the department of health must report to the governor and the appropriate committees on the results of the needs assessment by June 30, 2027.--- END ---